Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB403.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 29 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding parts to read:PART IPRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)PART IIIMMIGRATIONChapter21. Preemption and CooperationCHAPTER 21PREEMPTION AND COOPERATIONSec.123456789101112131415161718 2101. Scope of chapter.2102. Definitions.2103. Preemption.2104. Cooperation.§ 2101. Scope of chapter. This chapter applies to the preemption of municipal immigration policies and cooperation of Federal and State agencies relating to immigration.§ 2102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Corrections officer." As defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."County correctional institution." As defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102."Immigration Cooperation Fund" or "fund." The Immigration Cooperation Fund established under section 2103(e) (relating to preemption)."Immigration detainer request." A request by a Federal agency to maintain temporary custody of an alien, including a United States Homeland Security Form I-247 document or a similar or successor form."Immigration laws." Federal laws, regulations and policy memoranda relating to aliens, immigrants or immigration, including 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12 (relating to immigration and nationality) and 8 CFR (relating to aliens and nationality)."Individual adversely affected." Any of the following:20250HB0403PN0414 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A resident of a municipality alleged to be in violation of section 2103(a).(2) A municipal police officer as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 8951 (relating to definitions) who is employed by a municipality alleged to be in violation of section 2103(a), regardless of whether the municipal police officer is a resident of the municipality.(3) An individual who otherwise has standing under the laws of this Commonwealth to bring an action under section 2103(b)."Judicial officer." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Judicial staff." Administrative staff, as that term is defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102."Law enforcement agency." The Office of Attorney General, a district attorney's office or an agency that employs a law enforcement officer."Law enforcement officer." An officer of the United States, another state or political subdivision thereof, or of the Commonwealth or political subdivision thereof, who is empowered by law to conduct investigations of or to make arrests for offenses enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction and any attorney authorized by law to prosecute or participate in the prosecution of an offense."Municipality." Any county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality, optional charter municipality or any similar general purpose unit of government created or authorized by statute.20250HB0403PN0414 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Parole officer." A State parole agent appointed by the Pennsylvania Parole Board or a county probation or parole officer of the Commonwealth."Policy." An ordinance, a resolution, regulation, rule, practice or any other action, whether formal or informal, promulgated or enforced by a municipality."Reasonable expenses." Attorney fees, expert witness fees and court costs.§ 2103. Preemption.(a) Immigration policies preempted.--A municipality may not adopt or enforce a policy that prohibits or materially limits a law enforcement agency, law enforcement officer, corrections officer, parole officer, judicial officer or judicial staff from enforcing immigration laws, including the following:(1) Compliance with section 2104 (relating to cooperation).(2) Assisting or cooperating with an officer from United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or another Federal agency regarding immigration laws, including providing enforcement assistance.(3) Permitting an officer from United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or another Federal agency to enter a county correctional institution, including for the purpose of interviewing an individual in custody at the institution or enforcing immigration laws.(4) Inquiring into the immigration status of an individual in custody.(5) With respect to information relating to the release 20250HB0403PN0414 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 date or immigration status of an individual in custody, including information relating to name, date and place of birth:(i) Sending the information to or requesting or receiving the information from United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or another Federal agency.(ii) Maintaining the information.(iii) Exchanging the information with another municipality or Federal or state agency.(b) Relief.--An individual adversely affected by a policy prohibited under subsection (a) may file an action for declaratory or injunctive relief. Original jurisdiction for an action under this subsection shall be in Commonwealth Court or any other court with appropriate jurisdiction.(c) Prevailing party.--If an individual adversely affected provides written notice of the individual's intention to file an action in accordance with subsection (b) to the defendant 60 days prior to filing the action, the individual adversely affected shall be declared the prevailing party if:(1) a final determination by the court is granted, in whole or in part, in favor of the individual adversely affected; or(2) the policy in question is rescinded, repealed or otherwise abrogated after suit has been filed under subsection (b) but before the final determination by the court.(d) Reasonable expenses and damages.--If an individual adversely affected is declared a prevailing party, the court shall award all of the following to the individual adversely 20250HB0403PN0414 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 affected:(1) Reasonable expenses.(2) Actual damages.(3) Liquidated damages of $100,000 for each day that the policy prohibited under subsection (a) has been in effect or $1,000,000, whichever is greater, to be paid into the Immigration Cooperation Fund.(e) Fund established.--The Immigration Cooperation Fund is established as a restricted account in the General Fund. The fund shall include revenues from damages paid under subsection (d) and other money as may be appropriated or transferred into the fund. Money in the fund is appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis for the purpose of providing grants to law enforcement agencies to cooperate with Federal agencies regarding the enforcement of immigration laws.§ 2104. Cooperation.(a) Duty to cooperate with Federal immigration requests.--(1) A law enforcement agency or municipality that has custody of an individual subject to an immigration detainer request issued by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement shall:(i) Comply with, honor and fulfill any request made in the detainer request.(ii) Inform the individual that the individual is being held pursuant to an immigration detainer request issued by the Federal Government.(2) A law enforcement agency or municipality shall provide any information requested by United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or other Federal agency 20250HB0403PN0414 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relating to the release date or immigration status of any individual in its custody, including information relating to name, date and place of birth.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply if an individual provides proof that the individual is a citizen of the United States or has lawful immigration status in the United States.(c) Unconstitutional actions and discrimination prohibited.--To the extent prohibited by the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of Pennsylvania, a law enforcement agency or municipality may not consider the race, color, religion, language or national origin of an individual while cooperating with Federal agencies for the purpose of enforcing immigration laws.(d) Defense of law enforcement agencies and municipalities.--(1) The Attorney General shall defend a law enforcement agency or municipality from a civil action if all of the following apply:(i) The law enforcement agency or municipality requests the Attorney General's defense.(ii) The Attorney General determines that the civil action arises out of, in whole or in part, good faith compliance with this section.(2) If the Attorney General defends a law enforcement agency or municipality under this section, the Attorney General shall pay for the expenses and costs of the civil action, and the Commonwealth shall be liable for any judgment or settlement of the action. The law enforcement agency or municipality is not required to pay for the expenses, costs, 20250HB0403PN0414 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 judgment or settlement of the civil action.Section 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or applicability.Section 3. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB0403PN0414 - 8 - 12345678